Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.715

Identification of dental prostheses—Violation.

Failure of any dentist to comply with RCW 18.32.695 and 18.32.705 is a violation for which the dentist may be subject to proceedings if the dentist is charged with the violation within two years of initial insertion of the dental prosthetic device.

[ 1987 c 252 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.32.328.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 252: See note following RCW 18.32.695.